Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1102YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 749 Section 1. Section 411.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Any member in service may retire upon written application 3 to the system, setting forth at what time, not less than thirty 4 nor more than ninety days subsequent to the execution and 5 filing of the application, the member desires to be retired. 6 However, the member at the time specified for retirement shall 7 have attained the age of fifty-five and shall have served 8 twenty-two years or more, and notwithstanding that, during the 9 period of notification, the member may have separated from 10 the service. However, a member may retire at fifty years of 11 age and receive a reduced retirement allowance pursuant to 12 subsection 2A. 13 Sec. 2. Section 411.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 14 following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. Early retirement benefits. 16 a. Notwithstanding the calculation of the service retirement 17 allowance under subsection 2, beginning July 1, 2025, a member 18 who has completed twenty-two years or more of creditable 19 service and is at least fifty years of age, but less than 20 fifty-five years of age, who has otherwise completed the 21 requirements for retirement under subsection 1, may retire and 22 receive a reduced service retirement allowance pursuant to this 23 subsection. The service retirement allowance for a member 24 less than fifty-five years of age shall be calculated in the 25 manner prescribed in subsection 2, except that the percentage 26 multiplier of the memberâs average final compensation used in 27 the determination of the service retirement allowance shall be 28 reduced by the board of trustees pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 29 b. On July 1, 2025, and on each July 1 thereafter, the board 30 of trustees shall determine for the respective fiscal year the 31 percent by which the percentage multiplier under subsection 32 2 shall be reduced for each month that a memberâs retirement 33 date precedes the memberâs fifty-fifth birthday. The board 34 of trustees shall make this determination based upon the most 35 -1- LSB 1102YH (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 749 recent actuarial valuation of the system, the calculation of 1 the actuarial cost for each month of retirement of a member 2 prior to age fifty-five, and the premise that the provision of 3 a service retirement allowance to a member who is less than 4 fifty-five years of age will not result in any increase in cost 5 to the system. 6 Sec. 3. Section 411.6, subsection 11, unnumbered paragraph 7 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 In the event of the death of any member receiving a 9 retirement allowance under the provisions of subsection 2, 2A, 10 4, or 6 of this section there shall be paid a pension: 11